Hawaii statutes.
§660-17 Return to be prompt. Any
person to whom a writ of habeas corpus is directed, upon payment or tender of
reasonable charges or expenses for its execution if ordered by the court, and
any person to whom an order to show cause is directed, shall make return
thereto with as much promptness as the nature of the case will permit. [L 1870,
c 32, §12; RL 1925, §2740; RL 1935, §4325; RL 1945, §10366; am L 1953, c 101,
§10; RL 1955, §239-17; HRS §660-17; am L 1972, c 90, §5(k)]

Case Notes

Amendment of return. 15 H. 276 (1903).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next